tests/runtime/booleans.sbl
// Test strings

externals (stem)

booleans (b)

stringescapes {}

define stem as (
  true or fail='true failed'
  not false or fail='false did not fail'

  set b
  b or fail='set b did not set b'
  unset b
  not b or fail='unset b did not unset b'
  set b
  b or fail='set b did not set b (2)'
)
